Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
TEACHER LOAN FORGIVENESS PROGRAM

23-3.9-100.2. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

Colorado suffers from a shortage of teachers and other educators due to various factors affecting the teaching profession, which include but are not limited to declining enrollment and completion of educator preparation programs, low educator compensation and benefits, an insufficient number of educators in certain content areas, and difficulty in filling educator positions in rural or isolated areas of the state;

Pursuant to House Bill 17-1003, enacted in 2017, the department of higher education and the department of education, with input from education and community stakeholders, analyzed teacher and other educator shortages and issued a report including recommendations for addressing these shortages;

As part of their findings, the department of higher education and the department of education determined that the state has educator shortages in early childhood education; science; mathematics; world languages; special education; and art, music, and drama;

Further, shortages in these content areas are more pronounced in rural and remote rural areas where school districts and rural schools face additional challenges, including inadequate teacher compensation, lack of affordable housing, and an inability to attract new teachers to rural communities; and

The department of higher education and the department of education found that one strategy for addressing teacher and other educator shortages in hard-to-fill positions due to teaching content area or geographic location is to offer loan repayment of educational loans for educators who serve in these hard-to-fill positions in the state.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that implementing a loan forgiveness program for educators employed in qualified positions in the state is necessary to ensure that the needs of students are met in all Colorado public schools.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-003), ch. 333, p. 3075, § 1, effective May 29.

23-3.9-101. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Approved program of preparation" means a program of study for preparation that is approved by the Colorado commission on higher education pursuant to section 23-1-121 and that upon completion leads to a recommendation for licensure by an accepted institution of higher education in Colorado.

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education.

(2.5) "Educator" means a teacher, principal, or special services provider, as those terms are defined in section 22-60.5-102; except that a special services provider need not be employed by a school district.

"Facility school" means an approved facility school as defined in section 22-2-402 (1), C.R.S.

(3.5) Repealed.

(3.7) "Qualified loan" means an educational loan incurred while completing a program of preparation, including an alternative preparation program approved pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22, that leads to educator licensure pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22, or a bachelor's or master's degree in the area in which the educator is employed in a qualified position. The commission shall determine if a loan is a qualified loan for purposes of the educator loan forgiveness program created in section 23-3.9-102.

"Qualified position" means:

A hard-to-staff educator position in a rural school or rural school district or in a facility school that is in a rural school district identified by the department of education pursuant to section 23-3.9-102 (6); or

A hard-to-staff educator position in a Colorado public school, a school operated by a board of cooperative services created pursuant to article 5 of title 22, or a facility school in a content shortage area identified pursuant to section 23-3.9-102 (6).

"Rural school" or "rural school district" means a public school or school district identified by the department of education pursuant to section 23-3.9-102 (6).

"School" or "public school" means a public school as provided in section 22-1-101, including a charter school authorized by a school district pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22, an institute charter school authorized by the state charter school institute pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22, or a school operated by a board of cooperative services created and operating pursuant to article 5 of title 22.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire article added, p. 1503, § 30, effective June 8.

L. 2005:

(3.5) and (5) added and (4) amended, p. 533, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 1409, § 64, effective May 27; (5) amended, p. 1627, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

IP amended, (HB 18-1002), ch. 257, p. 1586, § 2, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(2.5), (3.7), and (6) added, (3.5) repealed, and (4) and (5) amended, (SB 19-003), ch. 333, p. 3076, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2020:

(3.7) amended, (SB 20-158), ch. 198, p. 968, § 1, effective June 30.

23-3.9-102. Educator loan forgiveness program - administration - fund - eligibility.

The general assembly authorizes the commission to develop and maintain an educator loan forgiveness program for implementation beginning in the 2019-20 academic year for payment of all or part of the principal and interest of the qualified loans of an educator who is hired for a qualified position. Money in the educator loan forgiveness fund, created in subsection (1)(b) of this section, may be used only for repayment of qualified loans through the educator loan forgiveness program. The commission is authorized to seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, and donations for the educator loan forgiveness program. The commission shall transmit all money received through gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the educator loan forgiveness fund, created in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The commission shall develop loan repayment policies that ensure that money in the educator loan forgiveness fund is used for the repayment of qualified loans of educators employed in qualified positions.

There is created the educator loan forgiveness fund, which consists of all money appropriated to the fund by the general assembly for the educator loan forgiveness program and any gifts, grants, and donations received for that purpose. Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the department of higher education for the educator loan forgiveness program. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund remains in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund; except that on August 30, 2033, any unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund shall be transferred to the general fund.

Subject to available appropriations, the commission shall annually approve applications for the educator loan forgiveness program. If more new participants apply than can be approved based on the money available in the educator loan forgiveness fund, the commission shall:

First, approve applicants who have contracted for a qualified position in a rural school district or rural school and in a content shortage area;

Second, approve applicants who have contracted for a qualified position in a rural school district or rural school; and

Third, approve applicants who have contracted for a qualified position in a content shortage area.

In approving applications for each group of applicants identified in subsections (1)(c)(I), (1)(c)(II), and (1)(c)(III) of this section, the commission shall:

Consider first those applicants who hold educator licenses issued pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22 and prioritize the approval of those applications based on the length of time each applicant has been employed under the license, beginning with those who have been employed the longest; and

Consider second those applicants who do not hold educator licenses issued pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22 and prioritize the approval of those applications based on the length of time the applicant has been employed as an educator.

In addition to any qualifications specified by the commission, to qualify for the educator loan forgiveness program, an educator must:

Graduate from a program of preparation that leads to educator licensure pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22;

Meet licensure requirements pursuant to section 22-60.5-201 (1)(b) or (1)(c), section 22-60.5-301 (1)(a) or (1)(b), or section 22-60.5-210;

Repealed.

Contract for a qualified position, as defined in section 23-3.9-101, no earlier than June 2019 and no later than the end of the 2027-28 academic year; and

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2019.)

Be liable for an outstanding balance on a qualified loan.

An educator who qualifies pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be eligible for up to five thousand dollars in loan forgiveness for each year of employment in a qualified position for up to a total of five years.

(3.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2019.)

If an educator qualifies for the educator loan forgiveness program through employment in a qualified position and in a subsequent academic year the position is no longer identified as a qualified position pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the educator may continue to participate in the educator loan forgiveness program if the educator continues in the same position in the same location or in a different position that is a qualified position.

If an educator qualifies for the educator loan forgiveness program and subsequently transfers to a nonqualifying position, the educator forfeits participant status pursuant to this section.

For purposes of defining a "qualified position" pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the department of education shall annually identify:

Rural school districts based on the geographic size of the district and the distance of the district from the nearest large, urbanized area;

Rural schools, which may include but are not limited to individual schools of a school district even though the school district as a whole is not identified as a rural school district if the department of education determines that, as a function of geographic characteristics, the school is experiencing educator shortages that are not experienced by other schools of the school district;

Content shortage areas, which may include those identified by the department of higher education and department of education in their November 2017 report, "Colorado's Teacher Shortages: Attracting and Retaining Excellent Educators", as well as other content shortage areas specific to Colorado that develop over the course of the educator loan forgiveness program. The department of education may identify content shortage areas generally and for specific geographic areas of the state.

Hard-to-fill educator positions due to geography or content shortage area, or both.

As part of its annual identification of rural schools, school districts, and content shortage areas, the department of education shall consider education and community stakeholder feedback.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire article added, p. 1503, § 30, effective June 8.

L. 2002:

(2)(c)(II) amended, p. 1794, § 57, effective June 7.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) and (2)(d) amended, p. 443, § 1, effective April 13; (1)(a) amended, p. 574, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(c)(II) and (2)(d) amended and (2)(e), (2)(f), (4), (5), and (6) added, p. 534, §§ 2, 3, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(1)(b) and (2)(d)(III) amended and (3.5) added, p. 1627, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-003), ch. 333, p. 3077, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2020:

IP(1)(c), IP(2), and (2)(a) amended and (2)(c) repealed, (SB 20-158), ch. 198, p. 968, § 2, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) added, (SB 21-185), ch. 246, p. 1339, § 22, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(a) by House Bill 04-1350 and House Bill 04-1039 were harmonized.

23-3.9-103. Reporting.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, on or before December 15, 2019, and on or before December 15 each year thereafter in which an educator is participating in the program, the commission shall prepare an annual report that includes, but is not limited to, the content shortage areas identified by the department of education; the number of applications received and the number of participants awarded loan forgiveness, the public schools in which the participants are employed, and demographic information for the participants; the approved teacher preparation program attended by the participants; and the amount of money applied toward loan forgiveness and the sources of the money. The report must also include, for all participants awarded loan forgiveness, the length of time each participant has remained in the program and has remained teaching in the public school or within the same school district. The commission shall provide notice to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, that the report is available to the members of the committees upon request.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire article added, p. 1504, § 30, effective June 8.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 862, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-003), ch. 333, p. 3080, § 4, effective May 29.

23-3.9-104. Repeal of part.

This part 1 is repealed, effective September 1, 2033.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire article added, p. 1504, § 30, effective June 8.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 535, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1628, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1002), ch. 257, p. 1586, § 3, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-003), ch. 333, p. 3080, § 5, effective May 29.